Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1703
Definitions; sections applicable.

For purposes of sections 81-1701 to 81-1721, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 81-1704 to 81-1710 shall be used.

Laws 1978, LB 715, § 3.